Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 8. Hydraulic Fracturing for Oil or Gas Recovery

§ 571.
Hydraulic fracturing; prohibition.

No person may engage in hydraulic fracturing in the State.

No person within the State may collect, store, or treat wastewater from hydraulic fracturing.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 16, 2012.